Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§79-37-601.
Consistency of application.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote consistency of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 32, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-602.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 USC Section 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 USC Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 USC Section 7003(b).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 33, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-603.
Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before January 1, 2015.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 34, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

§79-37-604.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 35, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.